Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 118.145 is amended to read:
118.145. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Eligible business entity” means a business entity that is owned  100 percent by family
members or eligible entities.
(b) “Eligible entity” means an eligible business entity or an eligible trust.
(c) “Eligible trust” means  a trust or subtrust whose permissible distributees are all
family members or eligible entities.
[(a)] (d) “Family member” means a  person within the third degree of relation, by blood, mar-
riage, adoption, civil union or domestic partnership, to another person.
(e) “Interest in natural resource property” means:
(A) Any direct ownership interest in natural resource property;
(B) An ownership interest or beneficial  interest in a business entity that owns natural
resource property, either directly  or indirectly through other business entities, but only to
the extent of the value of that portion of the  interest that is attributable to natural resource
property and  to the associated farm business, forestry business or fishing business owned
by the decedent; or
(C) Any beneficial interest in a trust that owns  natural resource property, but only to
the extent of the value of that portion of the  interest that is attributable to natural resource
property and  to the associated farm business, forestry business or fishing business owned
by the decedent.
[(b)] (f) “Materially participate” means to engage in the active management, as defined in sec-
tion 2032A of the Internal Revenue Code, of a  farm business, forestry business or fishing business
owned by the decedent on the date of the decedent’s death. The Department of Revenue  may adopt
rules to administer this section consistent with this definition.
[(c)] (g) “Natural resource property” has the meaning given that term in ORS 118.140.
(h) “Permissible distributee” has the meaning given that term in ORS 130.010.
(i) “Relevant business days” means those days during  which a person that is engaged in
active management of natural resource property would customarily be expected  to exercise
significant management activities, given the nature  of the industry in which the business is
operating.
Enrolled House Bill 3630 (HB 3630-INTRO) Page 1
(2) An interest in natural resource property is exempt from the tax imposed  under this chapter
if:
(a) The [ property] interest is held by a decedent  for at least five years before the death of the
decedent;
(b) During at least 75 percent of the relevant business days of each of the  five calendar years
immediately prior to the date of the decedent’s death, the  decedent or any family member of the
decedent materially participates in the farm business, forestry business or fishing business;
(c) The  interest is transferred, as a consequence of the decedent’s death, to one or more family
members of the decedent  or eligible  entities  [ and is subsequently owned by family members of the
decedent for  at least five consecutive calendar years beginning with the calendar year immediately fol-
lowing the date of the decedent’s death ]; and
(d) During [ at least 75 percent of the days of ] each of  the five calendar years immediately fol-
lowing the date of the decedent’s death, any  family member of the decedent materially participates
in the farm business, forestry business or fishing business.
(3) If, after the date of death of  the decedent, natural resource property previously
transferred from the decedent as a consequence of the decedent’s death:
(a) Is subsequently transferred to a family  member, the property shall be deemed to have
been owned by the family member  during the time that the property was held or deemed to
have been held by the transferor.
(b) Is subsequently transferred to an eligible entity, the property  shall be deemed to have
been owned by the eligible  entity during the time that the property was held or deemed to
have been held by the transferor.
(c) Is subsequently transferred and replaced by other property in a like-kind  exchange
as provided in section 1031 of the Internal Revenue Code, or is otherwise replaced with other
property within 180 days of the transfer, the replacement property shall be deemed to have
been owned by the transferor during the time  that the transferred property was held or
deemed to have been held by the transferor.
[(3)] (4) An additional tax under ORS 118.005 to 118.540 shall be imposed if:
(a) [The] An interest in  natural resource property  for which an exemption is allowed under this
section  is,  during the five calendar years following the date of the decedent’s death, subsequently
sold or otherwise transferred to a person other than a family member of the decedent  or an eligible
entity;
(b) The natural resource property is  held by an entity that ceases to be an eligible entity
because the permissible distributees or owners no  longer consist solely of family members
and the interest is deemed sold or otherwise transferred ; or
[(b)] (c) The material participation requirement of subsection (2)(d) of this section is not met.
(5) Natural resource property may be  replaced with real property or personal property
after the exemption under this section is claimed and not  result in a disposition subject to
an additional tax if the replacement property is used in the operation of the farm business,
forestry business or fishing business. Real property for which an exemption is claimed under
this section may be replaced only with real property that would  otherwise qualify as natural
resource property, and that replacement must be  made within one year to avoid a disposition
and additional tax, except that a replacement of property that is involuntarily converted
under section 1033 of the Internal Revenue Code must occur within two years.
[(4)] (6) The additional liability imposed under subsection [ (3)] (4) of this section shall be the
amount of  additional tax that would have been imposed had the transferred [ property] interest  been
included in the decedent’s taxable estate. The additional tax liability is the responsibility of the
owner of the  property at the time of the disposition or disqualifying event and is due within
six months after the date on which the disposition or event occurs.  Upon receiving  notice of
a subsequent  sale or other transfer of property for which an exemption has been claimed, or upon
receiving notice that the material participation requirement of subsection (2)(d) of this section has
not been met, the department shall immediately proceed to collect the additional tax.
Enrolled House Bill 3630 (HB 3630-INTRO) Page 2
[(5)] (7) An estate claiming the exemption under this section may not claim the credit allowed
under ORS 118.140.
[(6)] (8) The exemption allowed under this section may not exceed $15 million for the estate.
SECTION 2.  ORS 118.010 is amended to read:
118.010. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Nonresident decedent” means an individual who is  domiciled outside of Oregon on the date
the individual dies.
(b) “Resident decedent” means an individual who is domiciled in Oregon on  the date the indi-
vidual dies.
(2) A tax is imposed upon a transfer of the property of each:
(a) Resident decedent; and
(b) Nonresident decedent whose estate includes any interest in:
(A) Real property located in Oregon; or
(B) Tangible personal property located in Oregon.
(3) The Oregon taxable estate to be used for purposes of computing the  tax imposed under this
section shall be the federal taxable estate:
(a) Increased by:
(A) The deduction  for state estate, inheritance, legacy or succession taxes allowable under sec-
tion 2058 of the Internal Revenue Code; and
(B) If the decedent is a surviving spouse owning the property at death, the value of the following
property unless included in the federal taxable estate:
(i) Property  for which a deduction for Oregon special marital property under ORS 118.016 was
previously allowed; or
(ii) Property for which a separate Oregon election under section 2056  or 2056A of the Internal
Revenue Code was previously allowed; and
(b) Reduced by:
(A) The value on the date of the decedent’s death of  all Oregon special marital property under
ORS 118.013;
(B) The exemption allowed under ORS 118.145; and
(C) Any other applicable exclusions or deductions.
(4) The tax imposed under this section shall be calculated by applying the rates in the following
table. If the Oregon taxable estate is at  least the amount in column 1, but less than the amount in
column 2, the tax is the amount  in column 3, increased by the excess above the amount in column
1 multiplied by the percentage in column 4:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
1 2 3 4
$1,000,000 $1,500,000 $0 10.0%
1,500,000 2,500,000 50,000 10.25%
2,500,000 3,500,000 152,500 10.5%
3,500,000 4,500,000 257,500 11.0%
4,500,000 5,500,000 367,500 11.5%
5,500,000 6,500,000 482,500 12.0%
6,500,000 7,500,000 602,500 13.0%
7,500,000 8,500,000 732,500 14.0%
8,500,000 9,500,000 872,500 15.0%
9,500,000 1,022,500 16.0%
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(5)(a) In the  case of a resident decedent owning, on the date of the decedent’s death, real
property located outside Oregon or tangible personal property located  outside Oregon, the tax im-
Enrolled House Bill 3630 (HB 3630-INTRO) Page 3
posed under this section shall be the amount determined under  subsection (4) of this section multi-
plied by a ratio.
(b) The numerator of the ratio :
(A) Shall be  the sum of the value of the decedent’s real property located in Oregon, tangible
personal property located in Oregon and intangible personal property.
(B) [ The numerator ] May not  include any intangible personal property subject to a tax imposed,
as a result of the death of the decedent, by another state or country.
(C) May not include the value of the exemption allowed under ORS 118.145.
(c) The denominator of the ratio shall be the total value of the  decedent’s gross estate , less the
value of the exemption allowed under ORS 118.145 .
(6) In the case of a nonresident decedent owning, on  the date of the decedent’s death, real
property  located  in Oregon or tangible personal property located in Oregon, the tax imposed under
this section  shall be the amount determined under subsection (4) of this section multiplied by a ratio.
The numerator of the ratio shall be the sum of the value of the decedent’s real  property located in
Oregon and tangible  personal property located in Oregon , less the value of the exemption allowed
under ORS 118.145. The denominator shall be the total value of  the decedent’s gross estate , less
the value of the exemption allowed under ORS 118.145 .
(7) Payment, in whole or in part, of estate taxes from funds of an  estate or trust on any benefit
subject to tax under ORS 118.005 to 118.540 is not to be considered a further taxable benefit, when
such payment is directed by the decedent’s will or by a trust agreement.
(8)(a) If the federal taxable estate is determined  by making an election under section 2031(c),
2032, 2032A, 2056 or 2056A of the  Internal Revenue Code or another provision of the Internal Re-
venue Code, or if a federal estate tax return is not required  under the Internal Revenue Code, an
executor may make separate elections for state estate tax purposes under that same provision.
(b) An executor  may make elections under ORS 118.013, 118.140 and 118.145 and section 2056
of the Internal Revenue Code for state estate tax purposes.
(c) Elections described in this subsection are irrevocable.
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 118.010 and 118.145 by sections 1 and 2 of this  2025
Act apply to estates of decedents dying on or after July 1, 2025.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 3630 (HB 3630-INTRO) Page 4
Passed by House June 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 26, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3630 (HB 3630-INTRO) Page 5